Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB946.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(2)(i) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read:Section 4. Schedules of Controlled Substances.--The following schedules include the controlled substances listed or to be listed by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or trade name designated.* * *(2) Schedule II--In determining that a substance comes 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 within this schedule, the secretary shall find: a high potential for abuse, currently accepted medical use in the United States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions, and abuse may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence. The following controlled substances are included in this schedule:(i) Any of the following substances, of any quantity, except those narcotics specifically excepted or listed in other schedules, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:1. Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, including hydrocodone, morphine and oxycodone.2. Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in subclause 1, except that these substances shall not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.3. Opium poppy and poppy straw.4. Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but shall not include decocainized coca leaves or extracts of coca leaves, which extracts do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.5. Tianeptine.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.10. Tianeptine-related Adverse Health Events.--20250SB0946PN1067 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) The department shall monitor adverse health events associated with tianeptine and may collect data from health care providers, hospitals, poison control centers, coroners, medical examiners and law enforcement agencies.(b) The department shall issue public advisories regarding the dangers of tianeptine exposure when adverse health events or usage trends present a significant threat to public safety. The department may coordinate with local health departments, emergency responders and relevant Federal agencies to inform and protect the public.(c) The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including mandatory reporting requirements, data collection standards and interagency coordination protocols.(d) As used in this section, the term "adverse health event" shall mean the following:(1) Any acute or chronic physical, mental or behavioral condition that arises from the ingestion, use, misuse, abuse or withdrawal of tianeptine or any substance containing tianeptine, whether occurring independently or in combination with other substances, including:(i) Neurological symptoms, including confusion, sedation, loss of consciousness, seizures or coma.(ii) Respiratory effects, including depressed breathing or respiratory failure.(iii) Cardiovascular symptoms, including elevated or decreased heart rate, abnormal blood pressure or cardiac arrest.(iv) Psychological effects, including addiction, dependence, paranoia, hallucinations, anxiety or suicidal ideation.(v) Gastrointestinal symptoms, including nausea, vomiting or 20250SB0946PN1067 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abdominal distress.(vi) Withdrawal-related symptoms, including agitation, muscle pain, insomnia, tremors or cravings.(vii) Any fatal or life-threatening reaction, including those resulting from overdose or interaction with other substances.(2) Any emergency medical intervention, hospitalization or death linked to confirmed or suspected tianeptine exposure, as determined by medical or toxicological evidence.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0946PN1067 - 4 - 12345678910